District of Columbia statutes.
32-1014

Collective bargaining.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be deemed to interfere with, impede, or in any way diminish the right of employees to bargain collectively with their employers through representatives of their own choosing in order to establish wages or other conditions of work in excess of the standards applicable under the provisions of this subchapter.

Mar. 25, 1993, D.C. Law 9-248, § 15, 40 DCR 761
1981 Ed., § 36-220.13.